Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2005
Flagging birth certificate.

If a missing person was born in Nebraska, the department shall flag such person's birth certificate, and if such person was born in a county where a county agency records and maintains birth certificates, such agency shall also flag the birth certificate in its custody.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 85.